Utah statutes.
62A-4a-702.   Financial responsibility.

Financial responsibility for a child placed pursuant to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall, in the first instance, be determined in accordance with the provisions of Article V of the compact.  However, in the event of partial or complete default of performance thereunder, the provisions of Title 78B, Chapter 12, Utah Child Support Act, may also be invoked.

